Hawaii, session 2026, GM1174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that natural hair
braiding is a traditional practice that does not present
significant health and safety risks to consumers or
practitioners. While natural hair braiding is distinct from the
practice of cosmetology or barbering, existing law has been
interpreted to require natural hair braiders to obtain a license
from the board of barbering and cosmetology, imposing an undue
burden on those who engage in natural hair braiding as a
profession. Licensees are required to undergo education and
training for cosmetology practices that are outside the scope of
natural hair braiding, such as nail care and makeup application.
For these reasons, the legislature believes it is inappropriate
for natural hair braiders to be subject to the licensure
requirements under the Barbering and Cosmetology Licensing Act.
The legislature further finds that, although natural hair
braiders should be exempt from licensure due to the nature of
their practice, natural hair braiding nevertheless involves
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx
HHiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiin

Page 2 2876
SB. NO
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
direct contact with clients and the use of tools and materials
that, if not properly sanitized or sterilized, may create
conditions that pose risks to the health and safety of clients.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require natural
hair braiders to be registered, rather than licensed, under the
Barbering and Cosmetology Licensing Act.
SECTION 2. Chapter 439A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§439A- Natural hair braiders; registration required;
renewal. (a) Beginning January 1, 2028, no person shall engage
in the practice of natural hair braiding unless the person has
registered with the board under this section.
(b) Registration shall include:
(1) Submiss ion of a compl^t^a£pIJ^cation for re£.ist^^tion
on a form prescribed by the board;
(2) Evidence of completion of a course or program that
covers sanitation, health, and safety practices
required for natural hair braiding, approved by the
board by rule; and
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 2
IHlIIIHilliniiiliHillMlilll

Page 3
S.B. NO.
(3) An application fee in an amount as provided in rules
adopted by the board.
(c) Each certificate of registration shall be valid
through December 31 of each odd-numbered year. A registration
shall be renewed by December 31 of each odd-numbered year upon
meeting the requirements under subsection (d). Failure to renew
a registration shall cause the registration to be forfeited. A
registration that has been forfeited may be restored within one
year of the forfeiture date upon payment of renewal and
restoration fees. Failure to restore a forfeited registration
within one year shall result in the automatic termination of the
registration. A person whose registration has been terminated
pursuant to this section shall be required to reapply for a new
registration.A._new applicant.
(d) To renew a registration, the registrant shall submit
to the board:
(1) A complete application on a form prescribed by the
board;
(2) Evidence of completion of any continuing education
requirement that covers the sanitation, health, and
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 3
HllllillinHIHIIIIllllll

S.B. NO.
safety practices required for natural hair braiding,
as provided by rules of the board; and
A renewal fee in an amount as provided by rules of the
board.
(e) A natural hair braider shall not perform or attempt to
perform services for which a license or permit is required under
this chapter or advertise services in such a way that misleads
consumers to believe that the natural hair braider offers
services for which a license or permit is required under this
chapter. Any natural hair braider who violates this subsection
may be subj^ct to sancti£na aritho£i^zed under this cha£ter or
other law for the unlicensed practice of barbering or the
unlicensed practice of cosmetology.
(f) All registrants shall follow the sanitary practices as
provided by rules of the board and any other sanitary practices
or public health guidelines recommended by government agencies
to protect the health and safety of the public.
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit
a person from obtaining a private certification or an employer
from requiring a person to obtain a private certification.
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx
liiiniiiimiiigiiininiii

Page 5
S.B. NO.
(h) This section shall not apply to a person who holds a
Mcense or£ermit jjnder Jtliis cha£t^r^’'
SECTION 3. Section 439A-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding three new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read as follows:
’"'Braiding device" means blunt-tipped needles, clips,
combs, crochet hooks, curlers, curling irons, hair binders,
hairpins, rollers, scissors, or threads.
"Natural hair braider" means a person who engages in the
gract ice of na tjjra l j23A£^£a2:djjig^
"Natural hair braiding" includes:
(1) Braiding, cornrowing, extending, locking, twisting,
weaving, or wrapping hair by hand or with braiding
devices, and the minor trimming of hair extensions
incidental thereto;
(2) The use of natural or synthetic hair extensions,
natural or synthetic hair and fibers, decorative
beads, and other hair accessories;
(3) The jnal<ijT^and iaciji2 of jf;i2s from jiaVu£al^ha i£^
natural fibers, synthetic fibers, and hair extensions;
and
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 5
MiimniiiiMniiiHmiig

Page 6
S.B. NO.
(4) The use of topical agents, including conditioners,
gels, moisturizers, oils, or pomades in conjunction
with the performance of the practices described in
paragraphs (1) through (3).
"Natural hair braiding" does not include:
(1) The application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or other
preparations to:
(A) Alter the color of hair; or
(B) Straighten, curl, or alter the structure of hair;
or
(2) The use of chemical hair joining agents including
synthetic tape, keratin bonds, or fusion bonds."
SECTION 4. Section 439A-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-£•]§439A-3[-J-] License or permit required. (a) No person
shall for commercial purposes practice as a barber apprentice,
beauty apprentice, barber, beauty operator, or beauty
instructor; operate a barber shop, beauty shop, or beauty
school; or announce or advertise as being prepared or qualified
to practice or operate unless the person obtains a license or
permit as required by this chapter.
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 6
iiiiiMiHiiiiiiimii

Page 7
S.B. NO.
(b) The practice of barbering and practice of cosmetology
shall be carried on only by persons holding a license or permit
to practice in the State and only in barber shops or beauty
shops; provided that nothing in this chapter shall prevent or
prohibit a barber to practice barbering or beauty operator to
practice cosmetology:
(1) At any place for educational purposes;
(2) Upon persons at a health care, nursing, mental, or
correctional facility;
(3) At a charitable event; or
(4) At a person's private home, office, or hotel room when
requested to do so.
(c) All licensees and permittees shall follow the sanitary
practices as prescribed by rules of the board and any other
sanitary practices or public health guidelines recommended by
government agencies to protect the health and safety of the
public.
(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit
or restrict the practice of a profession by individuals who are
licensed, certified, or registered under the laws of the State
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 7
iiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiniwiiiniiii

Page 8
S.B. NO.
who are performing services within their authorized scope of
practice.
(e) This section shall not apply to persons registered
under section 4 39A-for activities within the practice of
natural hair braiding; provided that the department and board
shall retain enforcement authority over a registrant's conduct
outside that practice for which a license or permit under this
section is required."
SECTION 5. Section 439A-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a ) In addition to any other powers and duties authorized
by law, the board shall have all the powers necessary to
effectuate the purpose of this chapter, including the power to:
(1) Approve examinations for licensure to engage in the•
practice of barbering and practice of cosmetology;
(2) Issue apprentice permits or temporary permits;
(3) Grant, revoke, or suspend licenses, registrations,
apprentice permits, or temporary permits; and
(4) Establish, subject to chapter 91 and with the approval
of the governor and the director, rules governing the
practice of barbering practice of cosmetology^
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx

Page 9
S.B. NO.
and pract ice of naX4jral ha ix^ra idin3^ and the
standards and requirements for apprenticeship training
and courses of training provided by schools, which
shall have the force and effect of law."
SECTION 6. Section 439A-12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t]§439A-12E-]-] Display of licenses, certificates of
registration, or pemits. The license of a barber, beauty
operator, beauty instructor, barber shop, beauty shop, or beauty
school [7-]; the certificate of registration of a natural hair
braider; and the permit of a barber apprentice, beauty
apprentice, or temporary permittee, shall be conspicuously
displayed in the place of business or employment."
SECTION 7. Section 439A-15, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-F1S439A-15I-}-] Citation for licensee, registrant, or
permittee violations; fines. (a) In addition to any other
remedy available under this chapter, the department may issue a
citation to any person who holds a barber, beauty operator,
beauty instructor, barber shop, beauty shop, or beauty school
license [7-] ; a natural hair braider certificate of registration;
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 9
IIIRIIIIffllillllllHIIIIIIMMIill

Page 10 2876
S.B. NO
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
or a temporary permit or apprentice permit, for any of the
following violations of this chapter or rules adopted pursuant
to this chapter and chapter 91:
(1) Failure of [a-]j_
(A) A barber, beauty operator, beauty instructor,
barber shop, beauty shop, beauty school, barber
apprentice, beauty apprentice, or temporary
permittee engaged in the practice of barbering or
practice of cosmetology2 or
(B) A natural hair braider engaged in the practice of
natural hair braiding,
to display a license, certificate of registration, or
permit in a conspicuous place in the office, place of
business or employment, or school, during all hours of
operation;
(2) Failure of a barber shop owner, beauty shop owner, or
beauty school owner to ensure that only individuals
who hold a current and appropriate license or permit
engage in the practice of barbering or practice of
cosmetology in the barber shop, beauty shop, or beauty
school;
2026-2496 SB2876 GDI SMA.docx 1
HMMIIINIIIIIHimilinilll

Page 11
S.B. NO.
(3) Failure of a barber shop or beauty shop engaged in the
practice of barbering or practice of cosmetology to
conspicuously display in reception or work rooms, a
price list or sign that shall read "PRICE LIST
AVAILABLE UPON REQUEST" in capital letters at least
three-fourths of one inch;
(4) Failure of a beauty school to identify each beauty
instructor-trainee at the beauty school with a name
tag, stating that person's full name and the words
"Instructor-trainee", to be worn during all hours of
instruction;
(5) Failure of a beauty school to identify each beauty
instructor at the beauty school with a name tag,
stating that person's full name, the word
"Instructor", and identifying the beauty instructor's
appropriate beauty operator category, to be worn
during all hours of instruction;
(6) Failure of a beauty school, during all hours of
instruction, to operate the beauty school with a
beauty instructor-student ratio of at least one beauty
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx
MNinHIffllllMllllllllllMllil

Page 12
S.B. NO.
instructor for every twenty-five students, and with a
minimum of two beauty instructors; or
(7) Failure of a beauty school that performs work upon or
for members of the public to display, in a conspicuous
place in each reception and work room, a sign not less
than eighteen inches by twenty-four inches that shall
state "School of Beauty Culture—Work done by students
under supervision" in letters not less than one-half
of one inch.
(b) Each citation:
(1) Shall be in writing and describe the basis of the
citation, including the specific statute or rule
violated;
(2) May contain an order of abatement and the assessment
of a fine in the amount of $500 for each violation;
(3) Shall be served on the licensee, registrant, or
permittee by personal service; and
(4) Shall inform the licensee^^^2ist£an^ or permittee
that the licensee, registrant, or permittee may submit
a written request to the board or its designee for a
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx
MWIinilUNIiHMIIIII

Page 13
S.B. NO.
hearing to contest the citation, within twenty
calendar days from the service of the citation.
(c) If the licensee, registrant, or permittee timely
submits a written request to the board or its designee for a
hearing, the board may designate a hearings officer to conduct
the hearing in accordance with chapter 91.
(d) If the licensee, registrant, or permittee does not
timely submit a written request to the board or its designee for
a hearing, the citation shall be deemed a final order of the
board.
(e) Failure of a licensee, registrant, or permittee to pay
any assessed fine within thirty calendar days, unless the
licensee, registrant, or permittee contests the citation, may
result in further disciplinary action taken by the board."
SECTION 8. Section 439A-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-F]§439A-16[-3-] Refusal to grant license, certificate of
registration, or permit; suspension and revocation of licenses^
certificates of registration, or permits. (a) In addition to
any other actions authorized by law, the board may take
disciplinary action against any license, certificate of
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 3

Page 14
S.B. NO.
registration, or permit issued under this chapter, including but
not limited to suspension, revocation, fine, or a combination
thereof, or refuse to grant or renew any license, certificate of
registration, or permit for any cause authorized by law,
including but not limited to the following:
(1) Procuring a license, certificate of registration, or
permit through fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;
(2) Professional misconduct, gross negligence, or manifest
incapacity;
(3) Permitting a person without a license, certificate of
registration, apprentice permit, or temporary permit
to perform activities that require a license,
certificate of registration, apprentice permit, or
temporary permit under this chapter;
(4) Violation of this chapter or the rules adopted
pursuant thereto;
(5) Making any false representation or promise through
advertising or otherwise;
(6) Failing to display a license, certificate of
registration, apprentice permit, or temporary permit
as provided in this chapter;
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 1
MHIIIHIIHIIHillilllllig

Page 15
S.B. NO.
(7) Any other conduct constituting fraudulent or dishonest
dealings;
(8) Failing to comply with a board order; or
(9) Making a false statement on any document submitted or
required to be filed by this chapter.
(b) Any licensee, registrant, or permittee who violates
this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant thereto shall be
fined not less than $500 and not more than $2,000 for each
violation."
SECTION 9. Section 439A-16.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending its title and subsections (a) through (c)
to read:
" [-t]§439A-16.5[-}-] Revocation of license or certificate of
registration or denial of application to renew, restore, or
reinstate a license or certificate of registration based on
conviction requiring registration as a sex offender; conditions,
(a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board shall
automatically revoke a license or certificate of registration or
deny an application to renew, restore, or reinstate a license or
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx
illlHIIIMIIIIMIIIIHII

Page 16
S.B. NO.
certificate of registration under either of the following
circumstances:
(1) The licensee or registrant has been convicted in any
court in or outside of this State of any offense that,
if committed or attempted in this State, based on the
elements of the convicted offense, would have been
punishable as one or more of the offenses described in
chapter 846E; or
(2) The licensee or regi st rant has been required to
register as a sex offender pursuant to chapter 846E,
regardless of whether the related conviction has been
appealed.
(b) The board shall notify the licensee or registrant of
the license or certificate of registration revocation or denial
of application to renew, restore, or reinstate the license or
certificate of registration and of the right to elect to have a
hearing as provided in subsection (c).
(c) Upon revocation of the license or certificate of
registration or denial of an application to renew, restore, or
reinstate, the licensee or re£i sbrant may file a written request
for a hearing with the board within ten days of the notice. The
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 16
iiiWMiiiiiiHiiHniiiiHin

Page 17 2876
S.B. NO
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
hearing shall be held within thirty days of the revocation or
denial. The proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with
chapter 91."
2. By amending subsection (e) to read:
" (e) If the related conviction of the [-lieeft&e—helrde*^]
licensee or registrant is overturned upon appeal, the revocation
or denial ordered pursuant to this section shall automatically
cease. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the board from
pursuing disciplinary action based on any cause other than the
overturned conviction."
3. By amending subsection (g) to read:
"(g) The board shall not restore, renew, or otherwise
reinstate the license or certificate of registration of a person
under any of the following circumstances:
(1) The person has been required to register as a sex
offender pursuant to chapter 846E, regardless of
whether the conviction has been appealed; and
(2) The person engaged in the offense with a patient or
client, or with a former patient or client if the
relationship was terminated primarily for the purpose
of committing the offense."
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 1
IliMllinillllllHIIIIIIHIilll

Page 18
S.B. NO.
• • c.D. 1
SECTION 10. Section 439A-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
"(a) An appeal may be taken from a final action of the
board suspending or revoking a license, certificate of
registration, apprentice permit, or temporary permit for the
causes pursuant to section 439A-16 to the circuit court of the
circuit in which the person whose license, certificate of
registration, apprentice permit, or temporary permit has been
suspended or revoked resides.
(b) Any person aggrieved by the denial of a license,
certificate of registration, apprentice permit, or temporary
permit by the board may submit a request for a hearing pursuant
to chapter 91 within sixty days of the date of notification of
the denial or refusal."
SECTION 11. No later than November 1, 2026, the board of
barbering and cosmetology shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, prescribing the approved
courses or programs that cover sanitation, health, and safety
practices required for natural hair braiding, that are necessary
for registration under section 2 of this Act.
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 18
lillMMHIimiHIHIHin

Page 19
S.B. NO.
SECTION 12. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 13. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2496 SB2876 CDl SMA.docx 19
iiiiiiiiiMmmiiiiiiHiii

S.B. NO 2876
H,D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rcl day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I

S.B.No. 2876, H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
91-26

SB No. 2876, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives